Tennessee statutes. Title 38 Prevention And Detection Of Crime
Part 2

Narcotics Investigation Division

38-6-201. Creation.

There is created the narcotics investigation division within the Tennessee bureau of investigation.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.

38-6-202. Mission.

The mission of the narcotics investigation division shall be to investigate, gather evidence and assist in the prosecution of criminal offenses involving controlled substances, controlled substance analogues, narcotics, and other drugs.

The narcotics investigation division shall have original jurisdiction over the investigation of all drugs.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4; 2012, ch. 848, § 11.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.

38-6-203. [Obsolete.]

Compiler's Notes. Former § 38-6-203 (Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4), concerning assignment of agents, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2006.

38-6-204. Assistant director.

An assistant director shall be appointed by the director to administer the narcotics investigation division.

The assistant director shall be a person of experience and ability in the investigation or prosecution of criminal offenses involving controlled substances, narcotics and other drugs.

The assistant director, acting for and in consultation with the director, shall apply for all federal or state funds or grants that may be available for the purposes for which the narcotics investigation division was created.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.

38-6-205. Members of division — Qualifications — Drug Tests — Reassignment.

The narcotics investigation division shall consist of those agents transferred into the new division according to § 38-6-203 [deleted as obsolete], and an additional sixteen (16) agents. The division shall also include four (4) special agents in charge, two (2) secretaries, and one (1) executive secretary. The director, with the approval of the governor, may increase the number of persons employed in the narcotics investigation division, to any number as may be found feasible and necessary.

The assistant director and agents appointed shall be citizens of the United States and the state of Tennessee, and of good moral character. The agents and assistant director are required to satisfactorily complete a course of study at a United States department of justice federal drug enforcement agency operated school. If the federal drug enforcement agency ceases to operate these schools, the agents and assistant director shall satisfactorily complete a course of study, that includes current national drug trends and investigations, selected and approved by the TBI.

The narcotics investigation division may enter into agreements with bureaus, departments, or judicial drug task forces within the state of Tennessee or of other states or of the United States for the exchange or temporary assignment of agents for special undercover assignments and for performance of specific duties. The assistant director, at the direction of the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, is authorized to assign agents of the bureau to that duty and to request and accept agents from the other bureaus or departments for that duty.

At any time during the employment with the narcotics investigation division, the assistant director, at the direction of the director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation, may request an agent, employee, or other person working with the division, to submit to a mandatory drug test. Refusal to submit to take such drug test shall be grounds for dismissal.

All such agents shall be assigned to the narcotics investigation division; provided, that the director may, when necessary, temporarily reassign such agents to perform other duties within the bureau.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4; 2016, ch. 592, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Section 38-6-203, referred to in this section, was deemed obsolete and deleted by the code commission in 2006.

Amendments. The 2016 amendment rewrote subsection (b) which read: The assistant director and agents appointed shall be citizens of the United States and the state of Tennessee, and of good moral character. The agents shall have satisfactorily completed a prescribed course of study at a school operated by the federal drug enforcement agency, United States department of justice. The assistant director shall also be required to complete a prescribed course of study at a school operated by the federal drug enforcement agency, United States department of justice.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 592, § 2. March 10, 2016.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.

38-6-206. Cooperation with other departments.

The narcotics investigation division of the Tennessee bureau of investigation shall have the full cooperation and cooperate fully with the state board of pharmacy, the state board of medical examiners, the department of health, the department of revenue, the department of safety, judicial drug task forces, the district and county attorneys, and the office of the attorney general and reporter, and all local law enforcement agencies.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Board of medical examiners, title 63, ch. 6, part 1.

Board of pharmacy, title 63, ch. 10, part 3.

Department of health, title 4, ch. 3, part 1 and part 18.

Department of revenue, title 4, ch. 3, part 1 and part 19.

Department of safety, title 4, ch. 3, part 1 and part 20.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.

38-6-207. Presentation of written report to the general assembly.

The director of the Tennessee bureau of investigation and the assistant director of the narcotics investigation division shall present a written report each year to the judiciary committee of the house of representatives and the judiciary committee of the senate. The report shall include, but shall not be limited to, the number of investigations currently under way by the division, investigations that resulted in arrests during the previous year, the number of such arrests that resulted in convictions, the class of felony or misdemeanor convictions resulting from such arrests, and the schedule of drug or drugs involved in such arrests and convictions. The report shall also include information regarding the levels of cooperation encountered among the various agencies, internally and otherwise, and other related information regarding the activities of the narcotics investigation division. The purpose of the report shall be to inform the general assembly as to the effectiveness and needs of the division. The above information shall be reported by race or ethnicity where available.

Acts 1998, ch. 1069, § 4; 2013, ch. 236, § 39; 2019, ch. 345, § 51.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “judiciary” for “criminal justice” preceding “committee of the house”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 345, § 148. May 10, 2019.

Cross-References. Assignment of law enforcement officers to drug task forces, § 8-7-110.

Drug Control Act, title 39, ch. 17, part 4.

Drug Dealer Liability Act, title 29, ch. 38.